Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4074.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT Section 1. new text begin CONSTITUTIONAL AMENDMENT PROPOSED.new text end new text begin An amendment to the Minnesota Constitution is proposed to the people. If the amendment is adopted, article V, section 3, will read: new text end Sec. 3. The governor shall communicate by message to each session of the legislature information touching the state and country. He is commander-in-chief of the military and naval forces and may call them out to execute the laws, suppress insurrection and repel invasion. He may require the opinion in writing of the principal officer in each of the executive departments upon any subject relating to his duties. With the advice and consent of the senate he may appoint notaries public and other officers provided by law. He may appoint commissioners to take the acknowledgment of deeds or other instruments in writing to be used in the state. He shall take care that the laws be faithfully executed. He shall fill any vacancy that may occur in the offices of secretary of state, auditor, attorney general and the other state and district offices hereafter created by law until the end of the term for which the person who had vacated the office was elected or the first Monday in January following the next general election, whichever is sooner, and until a successor is chosen and qualified.new text begin The governor may declare an emergency and the emergency declaration may last for seven days unless an extension is granted by the legislature. The legislature may provide by law the process for conducting an emergency declaration in a manner authorized by this section.new text end Sec. 2. new text begin SUBMISSION TO VOTERS.new text end new text begin The proposed amendment must be submitted to the people at the 2026 general election. If ratified, the amendment is effective January 1, 2027. The question submitted must be: new text end new text begin "Shall the Minnesota Constitution be amended to allow the governor to declare an emergency? new text end new text begin Yes . new text end new text begin No . new text end new text begin " new text end ARTICLE 2 EMERGENCY DECLARATION ENABLING LEGISLATION Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 12.31, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Declaration of peacetime emergency. (a) The governor may declare a peacetime emergency. A peacetime declaration of emergency may be declared only when any of the following endangers life and property and local government resources are inadequate to handle the situation: (1) an act of nature; (2) a technological failure or malfunction; (3) a terrorist incident; (4) a cyber attack, including a physical or electronic attack on the state's information and telecommunications technology infrastructure, systems, or services; (5) an industrial accident; (6) a hazardous materials accident; or (7) a civil disturbance. If the peacetime emergency occurs on Indian lands, the governor or state director of emergency management shall consult with tribal authorities before the governor makes such a declaration. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the governor's authority to act without such consultation when the situation calls for prompt and timely action. When the governor declares a peacetime emergency, the governor must immediately notify the majority and minority leaders of the senate and the speaker and majority and minority leaders of the house of representatives. A peacetime emergency must not be continued for more than deleted text begin fivedeleted text end new text begin sevennew text end days unlessnew text begin , before it lapses, the peacetime emergency isnew text end extended by deleted text begin resolution of the Executive Councildeleted text end new text begin a majority vote of each house of the legislature fornew text end up to 30 days.new text begin A majority "no" vote from either house means the emergency declaration ceases when the seven days lapse. If the legislature is not sitting in session during the declaration of an emergency, the governor must issue a call immediately convening both houses of the legislature before the seven days lapse under the emergency declaration.new text end An order, or proclamation declaring, continuing, or terminating an emergency must be given prompt and general publicity and filed with the secretary of state. (b) By majority vote of each house of the legislature, the legislature may terminate a peacetime emergency extending beyond 30 days. If the governor determines a need to extend the peacetime emergency declaration beyond deleted text begin 30 daysdeleted text end new text begin the 30-day extension under paragraph (a)new text end and the legislature is not sitting in session, the governor must issue a call immediately convening both houses of the legislature. new text begin A majority "no" vote from either house means the emergency declaration ceases when the 30-day extension under paragraph (a) ends, unless the legislature votes to terminate the emergency declaration earlier. new text end Nothing in this section limits the governor's authority over or command of the National Guard as described in the Military Code, chapters 190 to 192A, and required by the Minnesota Constitution, article V, section 3. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, if the constitutional amendment proposed to the people in article 1 is adopted at the 2026 general election. new text end